Hawaii statutes.
[§321-223] State comprehensive emergency
medical services system, establishment. The department of health shall
establish, administer, and maintain the state comprehensive emergency medical
services system to serve the emergency health needs of the people of the
State. The department of health in the implementation of this part shall plan,
coordinate and provide assistance to all entities and agencies, public and
private, involved in the state system. All emergency medical services or
ambulance services conducted by or under the authority of the department of
health or any county shall be consistent with this part. [L 1978, c 148, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next